District of Columbia statutes.
47-1021

Young Women’s Christian Home.

The property, whether real or personal, owned by the trustees of Young Women’s Christian Home and used exclusively for the charitable purposes of said organization shall be exempt from taxation.

Feb. 23, 1887, 24 Stat. 413, ch. 217, § 2
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-1021.
1973 Ed., § 47-814.